Connecticut, session 2026, SB00229.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section, (1)
"electronic wagering platform", "fantasy contest", "lottery draw game"
and "online gaming operator" have the same meanings as provided in
section 12-850 of the general statutes, and (2) "keno" has the same
meaning as provided in section 12-801 of the general statutes.
(b) Each electronic wagering platform that exclusively provides (1)
fantasy contests, or (2) the sale of tickets for lottery draw games and
keno through the Internet, an online service or a mobile application shall
employ a geolocation system that, at a minimum, has the capacity to:
(A) (i) Detect the location of a patron's device notwithstanding the
use of a proxy server or virtual private network, or (ii) prohibit
participation of a patron utilizing a proxy server or virtual private
network;
(B) Using industry standard technologies approved by the
Department of Consumer Protection, (i) check the location of a patron's
device whenever such patron submits an entry fee for a fantasy contest
or purchases a lottery draw game or keno ticket, and (ii) prohibit a
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 229
patron from submitting such entry fee or making such purchase
whenever the location of the patron's device is unable to be determined;
(C) Provide a pop-up notification to a patron whenever the patron is
attempting to submit an entry fee for a fantasy contest or purchase a
lottery draw game or keno ticket when the location of the patron's
device is unable to be determined; and
(D) Notify the online gaming operator and the patron if the patron's
account is being accessed from geographically inconsistent locations,
including, but not limited to, multiple locations among which a patron
could not travel between each initiation of such entry fee payment or
purchase of a lottery draw game or keno ticket.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsections (b)(2)(B) and (b)(2)(C), three instances of "when" were
changed to "whenever" for clarity.
GL Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2